District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.06

Employee selection procedures — Evidence of validity.

(a)

Each person utilizing a selection procedure in choosing among candidates for a position shall have available for inspection evidence that the procedure does not violate § 1-607.05. Such evidence shall be examined for indications of possible discrimination, such as instances of higher rejection rates for minority candidates than nonminority candidates.

(b)

Evidence of selection procedure validity should consist of evidence demonstrating that the procedure is predictive of or significantly correlated with important elements of work behavior which comprise or are relevant to the job or jobs for which candidates are being evaluated.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 706, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-607.6.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.6.